Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Hazardous Materials

174.400.
Legislative intent.

Due to the central geographical location of the Commonwealth with respect to the hazardous materials industry, and since most predictions indicate that the amount of hazardous material in transport should substantially increase in the future, it is the intent of KRS

174.405

to

174.425

to provide for the public health and safety of the citizens and to protect the environment of the Commonwealth when any hazardous material is being transported within, or, in the case of radioactive materials, within or through this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since KRS

174.400

to

174.435

does not pertain to the transportation of radioactive materials in a private passenger’s automobile, a doctor who uses his private motor vehicle to transport radium for the treatment of his patients is not required to obtain a permit from the department of transportation in order to transport such material.

OAG 80-653

.

174.405.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

174.400

to

174.425

:

“Carrier” means a person engaged in the commercial transportation of passengers or property, except for pipelines and railways, by:

Land, as a common, contract, or private carrier; or

Civil aircraft.

“Hazardous material” means a substance designated hazardous by the Federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Law (49

U.S.C. sec. 5101

et seq.) and regulations issued pursuant thereto, including but not limited to hazardous and radioactive waste, but shall not include agricultural wastes, coal mining wastes, utility waste (fly ash, bottom ash, scrubber sludge), sludge from water treatment and sewage treatment facilities, cement kiln dust, gas and oil drilling muds, oil production brines or waste oil.

“Hazardous waste” means a substance or material defined as hazardous waste by KRS Chapter 224 and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

“Radioactive material” means any material or combination of material, which spontaneously emits ionizing radiation. Materials in which the estimated specific activity is not greater than 0.002 microcuries per gram of material, and in which the radioactivity is essentially uniformly distributed, are not considered to be radioactive materials.

“Radioactive waste” means any waste substance or combination of substances, in any form which because of its radioactive material content may create a threat to public health or to animal, plant, and aquatic life forms.

“Vehicle” means any device or contrivance for carrying or conveying persons, property, or substances, including conveyance by highways or by airway.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 384, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 99, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 165, § 10, effective June 20, 2005.

174.410.
Administrative regulations and agreements with other cabinets.

The secretary shall be responsible for controlling and regulating the movement of all radioactive materials and the intrastate transport of other hazardous materials transported by all carrier modes within the Commonwealth.

The secretary, in consultation with the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet and the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, shall adopt by reference or in entirety, the Federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Regulations, 49 C.F.R. (1978), as amended, to effectively carry out the intent of KRS

174.400

to

174.425

.

The cabinet and the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall cooperate with and assist the Energy and Environment Cabinet in implementing and enforcing the transportation provisions of any state hazardous waste regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 224. The specific nature and details of the assistance effort shall be established by a formal cooperative agreement acceptable to the cabinets, and all activities shall occur in accordance with the terms of the agreement. The agreement shall address and include but not necessarily be limited to the following items:

As a part of routine and periodic transportation checks and inspections, ensure that shipments of hazardous waste do not present a threat to the public or the environment; are accompanied by the required hazardous waste manifest or such other shipping or delivery documents as may be acceptable to the Energy and Environment Cabinet; and comply with applicable shipping standards;

Upon receipt of a written request from the secretary or general counsel of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, actively conduct field investigations relating to the illegal, improper, or unauthorized transport of hazardous waste in the state. Such investigations may, at a minimum, include passive and active surveillance, apprehension, and reporting, with the scope and extent of each investigation to be previously agreed to by the involved cabinets;

Compile and maintain such necessary records that may normally be required to carry out the provisions of this subsection and shall for minor violations report quarterly, and for major violations report weekly, to the Energy and Environment Cabinet on the status of the interagency hazardous-waste transportation monitoring and enforcement activity for irregularities or violations;

Provide any information, evidence, and other support, either in written form or in the form of oral testimony during a legal proceeding or both, as may be required by the Energy and Environment Cabinet to fully carry out its statutory responsibility under the appropriate sections of KRS Chapter 224;

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall, unless specifically agreed otherwise, have primary responsibility for initiating and conducting all legal proceedings arising from the terms and provisions of this subsection; and

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall provide sufficient training, technical assistance, and other support to the appropriate cabinets to prepare representatives of the cabinets to adequately carry out the responsibilities set forth in this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 484, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 99, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 121, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 142, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 181, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 228, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Cox, What May States Do About Out-of-State Waste in Light of Recent Supreme Court Decisions Applying the Dormant Commerce Clause? Kentucky As Case Study in the Waste Wars, 83 Ky. L.J. 551 (1994-95).

174.415.
Inspection and enforcement program.

The secretary shall establish an inspection and enforcement program to determine compliance with the provisions of KRS

174.400

to

174.425

, and any regulations promulgated under KRS

174.410

. In carrying out the provisions of KRS

174.400

to

174.425

, the secretary shall not duplicate the enforcement and inspection activities performed by the federal government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 384, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 99, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since KRS

174.400

to

174.435

does not pertain to the transportation of radioactive materials in a private passenger’s automobile, a doctor who uses his private motor vehicle to transport radium for the treatment of his patients is not required to obtain a permit from the department of transportation in order to transport such material.

OAG 80-653

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Stephens, Commencing the Decade With Environmental Reform: The 1980 Kentucky General Assembly Implements the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 69 Ky. L.J. 227 (1980-81).

174.420.
Carrying of shipping papers and hazardous waste manifest.

Any person transporting hazardous materials in the Commonwealth shall carry a copy of the shipping papers required in 49 C.F.R. (1978), as amended, in the transporting vehicle while in the Commonwealth.

In the event of an accident involving hazardous material, the operator of the vehicle shall:

Notify the Department of Kentucky State Police of the accident within one (1) hour, who shall then notify the local jurisdiction and any other appropriate state agency with emergency action responsibility, and

Provide the shipping papers to state and local emergency response authorities, and immediately bring to their attention the fact that the vehicle is transporting hazardous materials.

In addition to the other requirements of this section, any person transporting hazardous wastes shall carry in the transporting vehicle a copy of a manifest in a form approved by the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 384, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 99, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 182, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 229, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Stephens, Commencing the Decade With Environmental Reform: The 1980 Kentucky General Assembly Implements the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 69 Ky. L.J. 227 (1980-81).

174.425.
Exemption for national security purposes.

The provisions of KRS

174.400

to

174.425

shall not apply to hazardous materials shipped by the United States government. Nothing herein shall be construed as requiring the disclosure of any defense information or restricted data as defined in 42

U.S.C. secs. 2011

et seq. and 42

U.S.C. secs. 5801

et seq.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 384, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 99, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

174.430.
Fees. [Repealed.]

174.435.
Exemption. [Repealed.]